New Jersey, session 221, A2195.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. There is hereby established in the Department of Transportation the Office of Statewide Mobility Manager for the purpose of providing assistance with transportation services and trip-planning guidance for persons diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder and persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their guardians, families, caregivers, and service providers. b.   For the purpose of providing assistance with transportation services and trip-planning guidance for persons diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder and persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their guardians, families, caregivers, and service providers, the Office of Statewide Mobility Manager shall: (1)  be informed on and knowledgeable of the laws and practices concerning public transportation, private transportation, and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.) and any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, and any federal regulations adopted thereunder; (2) identify and help secure feasible transportation alternatives for persons diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder and persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their guardians, families, caregivers, and service providers; (3)  provide uniform information on transportation services and trip-planning guidance for all New Jersey residents regardless of location; (4)  assist the State and counties with coordination strategies, including but not limited to linking regions and connecting people with existing transit services; and (5)   take any other action to fulfill the purposes of the office. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.